Utah statutes.
75-3-105.   Proceedings affecting devolution and administration -- Jurisdiction of subject matter.

(1) Persons interested in decedents' estates may apply to the registrar for determination in the informal proceedings provided in this chapter and may petition the court for orders in formal proceedings within the court's jurisdiction, including, but not limited to those described in this chapter. The court may hear and determine formal proceedings involving administration and distribution of decedents' estates after notice to interested persons in conformity with Section 75-1-401. Persons notified are bound though less than all interested persons may have been given notice.

(2)  For purposes of this code, formal proceedings involving administration and distribution of decedent's estates shall include proceedings to determine the heirs of a decedent and proceedings to construe a duly probated will of a decedent, whether or not the estate of the decedent is being, or previously has been, administered or distributed.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

